Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7126.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
ARTICLE 1 RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN
SUPPORT OF FY 2026

ARTICLE 1
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2026
SECTION 1. Subject to the conditions, limitations and restrictions hereinafter contained in
this act, the following general revenue amounts are hereby appropriated out of any money in the
treasury not otherwise appropriated to be expended during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
The amounts identified for federal funds and restricted receipts shall be made available pursuant to
§ 35-4-22 and chapter 41 of title 42. For the purposes and functions hereinafter mentioned, the state
controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw the state controller’s orders upon the general
treasurer for the payment of such sums or such portions thereof as may be required from time to
time upon receipt by the state controller of properly authenticated vouchers.
FY 2026 FY 2026 FY 2026
Enacted Change FINAL
Administration
Central Management
General Revenues 4,359,358 (364,055) 3,995,303
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 33,000,000 (14,612,638) 18,387,362
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Community Learning Center Programming
Support Grant 0 2,000,000 2,000,000
Municipal Public Safety Infrastructure 0 4,400,236 4,400,236
Public Health Response Warehouse Support 0 1,000,562 1,000,562
Restricted Receipts 193,701 0 193,701
Total - Central Management 37,553,059 (7,575,895) 29,977,164
Legal Services
General Revenues 2,872,990 (2,294) 2,870,696
Accounts and Control
General Revenues 5,804,845 214,013 6,018,858
Restricted Receipts - OPEB Board Administration 150,959 23,575 174,534
Restricted Receipts - Grants Management
Administration 2,540,109 (1,385,873) 1,154,236
Total - Accounts and Control 8,495,913 (1,148,285) 7,347,628
Office of Management and Budget
General Revenues 11,000,012 (86,931) 10,913,081
LC004135 - Page 2 of 51

Federal Funds
Federal Funds 151,689 (1,097) 150,592
Federal Funds – Capital Projects Fund
CPF Administration 530,582 922,803 1,453,385
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Pandemic Recovery Office 1,436,547 (211,380) 1,225,167
Restricted Receipts 300,000 0 300,000
Other Funds 1,242,011 (71,378) 1,170,633
Total - Office of Management and Budget 14,660,841 552,017 15,212,858
Purchasing
General Revenues 4,008,986 (170,228) 3,838,758
Restricted Receipts 1,262,987 511,718 1,774,705
Other Funds 636,500 10,265 646,765
Total - Purchasing 5,908,473 351,755 6,260,228
Human Resources
General Revenues 889,580 86,675 976,255
Personnel Appeal Board
General Revenues 160,838 (9,891) 150,947
Information Technology
General Revenues 1,838,147 222,030 2,060,177
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
ERP Implementation Support 0 563,506 563,506
Restricted Receipts 1,162,424 34,969,669 36,132,093
Total - Information Technology 3,000,571 35,755,205 38,755,776
Library and Information Services
General Revenues 2,143,053 18,188 2,161,241
Federal Funds 1,617,500 (5,765) 1,611,735
Restricted Receipts 6,990 0 6,990
Total - Library and Information Services 3,767,543 12,423 3,779,966
Planning
General Revenues 1,222,229 1,284 1,223,513
Federal Funds 3,050 (3,050) 0
Restricted Receipts 50,000 0 50,000
Other Funds
LC004135 - Page 3 of 51

Air Quality Modeling 24,000 0 24,000
Federal Highway - PL Systems Planning 3,821,438 (34,123) 3,787,315
State Transportation Planning Match 504,926 150,794 655,720
FTA - Metro Planning Grant 1,525,830 22,142 1,547,972
Total - Planning 7,151,473 137,047 7,288,520
General
General Revenues
Miscellaneous Grants/Payments 811,678 0 811,678
Torts Court Awards 1,750,000 (250,000) 1,500,000
Wrongful Conviction Awards 1,000,000 (100,000) 900,000
Resource Sharing and State Library Aid 12,095,022 0 12,095,022
Library Construction Aid 2,115,628 0 2,115,628
Federal Funds- Capital Projects Fund
Community Learning Center Municipal
Grant Program 0 83,220,128 83,220,128
Restricted Receipts 1,113,557 482,443 1,596,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Security Measures State Buildings 700,000 48,142 748,142
Cranston Street Armory 600,000 0 600,000
State House Renovations 1,759,000 4,058,137 5,817,137
Zambarano Buildings and Campus 4,500,000 18,775,952 23,275,952
Replacement of Fueling Tanks 430,000 1,061,480 1,491,480
Environmental Compliance 225,000 475,605 700,605
Big River Management Area 797,000 649,895 1,446,895
Shepard Building Upgrades 2,805,000 1,663,020 4,468,020
RI Convention Center Authority 2,800,000 0 2,800,000
Pastore Center Power Plant 2,000,000 552,612 2,552,612
DoIT Enterprise Operations Center 5,550,000 4,617,005 10,167,005
Cannon Building 150,000 47,658 197,658
Old State House 600,000 1,179,347 1,779,347
State Office Building 500,000 600,111 1,100,111
State Office Reorganization & Relocation 750,000 1,012,964 1,762,964
William Powers Building 2,500,000 2,300,453 4,800,453
LC004135 - Page 4 of 51

Pastore Center Non-Hospital Buildings Asset
Protection 7,750,000 11,069,333 18,819,333
Washington County Government Center 100,000 177,311 277,311
Chapin Health Laboratory 100,000 100,655 200,655
560 Jefferson Blvd Asset Protection 2,050,000 796,420 2,846,420
Arrigan Center 200,000 94,888 294,888
Civic Center 3,800,000 0 3,800,000
Veterans Auditorium 380,000 0 380,000
Pastore Center Hospital Buildings Asset
Protection 1,000,000 988,418 1,988,418
Pastore Campus Infrastructure 15,000,000 19,227,222 34,227,222
Community Facilities Asset Protection 225,000 1,090,380 1,315,380
Medical Examiners - New Facility 50,000 992,038 1,042,038
Group Home Replacement & Rehabilitation 5,000,000 1,984,225 6,984,225
Expo Center 500,000 922,590 1,422,590
Group Homes Consolidation 5,350,000 1,780,051 7,130,051
Accessibility - Facility Renovations 0 420,686 420,686
BHDDH Group Homes 0 139,769 139,769
Hospital Reorganization 0 12,175,644 12,175,644
Pastore Center Buildings Demolition 0 6,295,540 6,295,540
Statewide Facility Master Plan 0 545,258 545,258
State Land Use Planning Study 0 250,000 250,000
Zambarano LTAC Hospital 0 6,439,929 6,439,929
Total - General 87,056,885 185,885,309 272,942,194
Debt Service Payments
General Revenues 178,801,286 (13,260,160) 165,541,126
Other Funds
Transportation Debt Service 32,982,697 (330,710) 32,651,987
Investment Receipts - Bond Funds 100,000 0 100,000
Total - Debt Service Payments 211,883,983 (13,590,870) 198,293,113
Rhode Island Health Benefits Exchange
General Revenues 1,889,227 (776,000) 1,113,227
Federal Funds 10,758,473 (1,203,479) 9,554,994
Restricted Receipts 17,298,973 4,055,119 21,354,092
LC004135 - Page 5 of 51

Total - Rhode Island Health Benefits
Exchange 29,946,673 2,075,640 32,022,313
Division of Equity, Diversity & Inclusion
General Revenues 2,308,469 7,935 2,316,404
Other Funds 108,978 174 109,152
Total - Division of Equity, Diversity &
Inclusion 2,417,447 8,109 2,425,556
Capital Asset Management and Maintenance
General Revenues 10,990,302 98,234 11,088,536
Federal Funds 0 750,000 750,000
Statewide Personnel and Operations
FEMA Contingency Reserve
General Revenues 2,500,000 140,091 2,640,091
Primary Care Health Assessment State Cost
General Revenues 750,000 (750,000) 0
Federal Funds 100,500 (100,500) 0
Restricted Receipts 44,575 (44,575) 0
Other Funds 477,295 (477,295) 0
Total - Statewide Personnel and Operations 3,872,370 (1,232,279) 2,640,091
Grand Total - Administration 430,628,941 202,152,900 632,781,841
Office of Energy Resources
General Revenues 0 275,313 275,313
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 31,554,214 (8,216,395) 23,337,819
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Electric Heat Pump Grant Program 0 697,440 697,440
Restricted Receipts 39,089,028 (1,384,204) 37,704,824
Other Funds
National Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Formula
Program 4,668,785 9,901,355 14,570,140
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Energy Efficiency Improvements 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Grand Total – Office of Energy Resources 76,312,027 1,273,509 77,585,536
Business Regulation
LC004135 - Page 6 of 51

Central Management
General Revenues 4,360,810 (417,655) 3,943,155
Restricted Receipts 39,014 0 39,014
Total - Central Management 4,399,824 (417,655) 3,982,169
Banking Regulation
General Revenues 2,107,972 (68,694) 2,039,278
Restricted Receipts 50,000 50,000 100,000
Total - Banking Regulation 2,157,972 (18,694) 2,139,278
Securities Regulation
General Revenues 1,000,863 (5,105) 995,758
Insurance Regulation
General Revenues 5,125,539 155,773 5,281,312
Restricted Receipts 1,617,538 800,000 2,417,538
Total - Insurance Regulation 6,743,077 955,773 7,698,850
Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner
General Revenues 3,107,152 (75,848) 3,031,304
Federal Funds 439,300 90,000 529,300
Restricted Receipts 603,592 (7,267) 596,325
Total - Office of the Health Insurance
Commissioner 4,150,044 6,885 4,156,929
Board of Accountancy
General Revenues 5,490 0 5,490
Commercial Licensing and Gaming and Athletics Licensing
General Revenues 1,268,739 95,957 1,364,696
Restricted Receipts 1,045,581 201,906 1,247,487
Total - Commercial Licensing and Gaming and Athletics
Licensing 2,314,320 297,863 2,612,183
Building, Design and Fire Professionals
General Revenues 8,793,216 192,341 8,985,557
Federal Funds 346,788 (2,500) 344,288
Restricted Receipts 2,130,377 660,041 2,790,418
Other Funds
Quonset Development Corporation 52,983 14,323 67,306
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
LC004135 - Page 7 of 51

Fire Academy Expansion 7,000,000 839,925 7,839,925
Total - Building, Design and Fire
Professionals 18,323,364 1,704,130 20,027,494
Grand Total - Business Regulation 39,094,954 2,523,197 41,618,151
RI Cannabis Control Commission
Restricted Receipts 7,303,563 (17,033) 7,286,530
Executive Office of Commerce
Central Management
General Revenues 2,369,982 16,871 2,386,853
Quasi-Public Appropriations
General Revenues
Rhode Island Commerce Corporation 8,506,041 0 8,506,041
Airport Impact Aid 1,010,036 0 1,010,036
Sixty percent (60%) of the first $1,000,000 appropriated for airport impact aid shall be
distributed to each airport serving more than 1,000,000 passengers based upon its percentage of the
total passengers served by all airports serving more than 1,000,000 passengers. Forty percent (40%)
of the first $1,000,000 shall be distributed based on the share of landings during calendar year 2025
at North Central Airport, Newport-Middletown Airport, Block Island Airport, Quonset Airport,
T.F. Green International Airport and Westerly Airport, respectively. The Rhode Island commerce
corporation shall make an impact payment to the towns or cities in which the airport is located
based on this calculation. Each community upon which any part of the above airports is located
shall receive at least $25,000.
STAC Research Alliance 900,000 0 900,000
Innovative Matching Grants/Internships 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
I-195 Redevelopment District Commission 1,245,050 0 1,245,050
Polaris Manufacturing Grant 500,000 0 500,000
East Providence Waterfront Commission 50,000 0 50,000
Urban Ventures 140,000 0 140,000
Chafee Center at Bryant 476,200 0 476,200
Blackstone Valley Visitor Center 75,000 0 75,000
Industrial Recreational Building Authority
Obligations 105,094 0 105,094
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Port of Davisville 0 279 279
LC004135 - Page 8 of 51

Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
I-195 Redevelopment District Commission 700,000 34,602 734,602
I-195 Park Improvements 1,100,000 1,357,200 2,457,200
Quonset Infrastructure 2,500,000 0 2,500,000
PFAS Mitigation at Quonset Business Park 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Total - Quasi-Public Appropriations 19,307,421 1,392,081 20,699,502
Economic Development Initiatives Fund
General Revenues
Rebuild RI Tax Credit Fund 10,085,000 0 10,085,000
Destination Marketing 1,400,000 0 1,400,000
RI Innovation Ecosystem 250,000 0 250,000
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 20,000,000 (19,305,563) 694,437
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Assistance to Impacted Industries 0 1,341,963 1,341,963
Total - Economic Development Initiatives
Fund 31,735,000 (17,963,600) 13,771,400
Commerce Programs
General Revenues
Wavemaker Fellowship 2,566,621 0 2,566,621
Air Service Development Fund 2,728,800 0 2,728,800
Main Street RI Streetscape Improvement Fund 125,000 0 125,000
Federal Funds
Federal Funds – Capital Projects Fund
Broadband 0 24,644,868 24,644,868
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Bioscience Investments 0 24,189,278 24,189,278
Total - Commerce Programs 5,420,421 48,834,146 54,254,567
Grand Total - Executive Office of
Commerce 58,832,824 32,279,498 91,112,322
Housing
General Revenues 6,464,465 1,189,660 7,654,125
Provided that $100,000 shall support Sojourner House’s supportive housing and rapid
LC004135 - Page 9 of 51

rehousing activities.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 15,596,037 6,060,779 21,656,816
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Homelessness Assistance Program 0 9,010,861 9,010,861
Development of Affordable Housing 0 40,002,001 40,002,001
Home Repair and Community Revitalization 0 9,738,194 9,738,194
Homelessness Infrastructure 0 4,185,576 4,185,576
Housing Related Infrastructure 0 1,927,964 1,927,964
Municipal Homelessness Support Initiative 0 719,104 719,104
Municipal Planning 0 1,658,224 1,658,224
Predevelopment and Capacity Building 0 41,192 41,192
Site Acquisition 0 900 900
Proactive Housing Development 0 700,000 700,000
Statewide Housing Plan 0 1,017,513 1,017,513
Targeted Housing Development 0 18,001,903 18,001,903
Workforce Housing 0 8,325,097 8,325,097
Restricted Receipts 23,018,954 16,789,136 39,808,090
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Housing Asset Protection 0 300,000 300,000
Grand Total - Housing 45,079,456 119,668,104 164,747,560
Labor and Training
Central Management
General Revenues 1,661,890 (209,450) 1,452,440
Restricted Receipts 488,494 (71,995) 416,499
Total - Central Management 2,150,384 (281,445) 1,868,939
Workforce Development Services
General Revenues 878,758 1,105 879,863
Federal Funds 19,112,629 1,528,002 20,640,631
Other Funds 0 41,336 41,336
Total - Workforce Development Services 19,991,387 1,570,443 21,561,830
Workforce Regulation and Safety
General Revenues 5,347,291 65,466 5,412,757
LC004135 - Page 10 of 51

Income Support
General Revenues 3,684,566 199,291 3,883,857
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 22,883,898 534,009 23,417,907
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund Contribution 0 1,196 1,196
Restricted Receipts 4,635,586 549,819 5,185,405
Other Funds
Temporary Disability Insurance Fund 287,480,146 966,971 288,447,117
Employment Security Fund 249,200,000 19,200,000 268,400,000
Total - Income Support 567,884,196 21,451,286 589,335,482
Injured Workers Services
Restricted Receipts 11,233,092 1,189,330 12,422,422
Labor Relations Board
General Revenues 556,737 75,807 632,544
Governor’s Workforce Board
General Revenues 6,050,000 565,780 6,615,780
Provided that $600,000 of these funds shall be used for enhanced training for direct care
and support services staff to improve resident quality of care and address the changing health care
needs of nursing facility residents due to higher acuity and increased cognitive impairments
pursuant to § 23-17.5-36.
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Enhanced Real Jobs 0 65,508 65,508
Restricted Receipts 19,054,596 1,129,129 20,183,725
Provided that at least $150,000 of these funds shall be used to provide hospitality industry
workforce training grants including, but not limited to, certified food and alcohol safety training
programs offered in multiple languages.
Total - Governor’s Workforce Board 25,104,596 1,760,417 26,865,013
Grand Total - Labor and Training 632,267,683 25,831,304 658,098,987
Department of Revenue
Director of Revenue
General Revenues 3,168,518 (239,886) 2,928,632
Office of Revenue Analysis
General Revenues 1,173,041 30,757 1,203,798
LC004135 - Page 11 of 51

Lottery Division
Other Funds
Other Funds 448,042,227 (14,705,340) 433,336,887
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Lottery Building Enhancements 0 756,319 756,319
Total - Lottery Division 448,042,227 (13,949,021) 434,093,206
Municipal Finance
General Revenues 2,045,839 (41,494) 2,004,345
Taxation
General Revenues 38,331,490 (242,921) 38,088,569
Restricted Receipts 4,660,479 (2,899,352) 1,761,127
Other Funds
Motor Fuel Tax Evasion 175,000 0 175,000
Total - Taxation 43,166,969 (3,142,273) 40,024,696
Registry of Motor Vehicles
General Revenues 35,374,576 1,419,872 36,794,448
Federal Funds 493,061 (93,061) 400,000
Restricted Receipts 5,429,330 200,000 5,629,330
Total - Registry of Motor Vehicles 41,296,967 1,526,811 42,823,778
State Aid
General Revenues
Distressed Communities Relief Fund 14,884,458 0 14,884,458
Payment in Lieu of Tax Exempt Properties 51,317,647 0 51,317,647
Motor Vehicle Excise Tax Payments 239,547,419 2,817 239,550,236
Property Revaluation Program 712,390 0 712,390
Tangible Tax Exemption Program 25,903,228 5,241 25,908,469
Restricted Receipts 995,120 129,880 1,125,000
Total - State Aid 333,360,262 137,938 333,498,200
Collections
General Revenues 994,263 81,979 1,076,242
Grand Total - Revenue 873,248,086 (15,595,189) 857,652,897
Legislature
General Revenues 58,734,623 8,425,979 67,160,602
Restricted Receipts 2,690,297 48,607 2,738,904
LC004135 - Page 12 of 51

Grand Total - Legislature 61,424,920 8,474,586 69,899,506
Lieutenant Governor
General Revenues 1,519,219 13,043 1,532,262
Secretary of State
Administration
General Revenues 5,975,167 190,914 6,166,081
Provided that $100,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Council for the
Humanities for grant making to civic and cultural organizations, and $50,000 to support Rhode
Island’s participation in the We the People Civics Challenge.
Corporations
General Revenues 2,913,879 (234,144) 2,679,735
State Archives
General Revenues 356,659 97,534 454,193
Restricted Receipts 404,790 (18,631) 386,159
Total - State Archives 761,449 78,903 840,352
Elections and Civics
General Revenues 2,107,040 (50,018) 2,057,022
Federal Funds 2,000,000 0 2,000,000
Total - Elections and Civics 4,107,040 (50,018) 4,057,022
State Library
General Revenues 668,263 (5,695) 662,568
Provided that $125,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Historical Society and
$18,000 be allocated to support the Newport Historical Society, pursuant to §§ 29-2-1 and 29-2-2,
and $25,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Black Heritage Society.
Office of Public Information
General Revenues 840,724 (11,441) 829,283
Receipted Receipts 25,000 0 25,000
Total - Office of Public Information 865,724 (11,441) 854,283
Grand Total - Secretary of State 15,291,522 (31,481) 15,260,041
General Treasurer
Treasury
General Revenues 3,665,773 786,537 4,452,310
Provided that unexpended or unencumbered balances for the Medical Debt Relief program
as of June 30, 2026 are hereby reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
LC004135 - Page 13 of 51

Federal Funds 365,134 (3,358) 361,776
Other Funds
Temporary Disability Insurance Fund 246,415 (526) 245,889
Tuition Savings Program - Administration 388,916 (16,292) 372,624
Total - Treasury 4,666,238 766,361 5,432,599
State Retirement System
Restricted Receipts
Admin Expenses - State Retirement System 13,193,967 (23,242) 13,170,725
Retirement - Treasury Investment Operations 2,846,571 191,370 3,037,941
Defined Contribution - Administration 277,654 (19,151) 258,503
Total - State Retirement System 16,318,192 148,977 16,467,169
Unclaimed Property
Restricted Receipts 3,338,043 32,855 3,370,898
Crime Victim Compensation
General Revenues 934,450 504 934,954
Federal Funds 467,993 0 467,993
Restricted Receipts 250,000 (29,751) 220,249
Total - Crime Victim Compensation 1,652,443 (29,247) 1,623,196
Grand Total - General Treasurer 25,974,916 918,946 26,893,862
Board of Elections
General Revenues 4,474,931 506,347 4,981,278
Rhode Island Ethics Commission
General Revenues 2,419,632 40,783 2,460,415
Office of Governor
General Revenues
General Revenues 9,184,918 34,593 9,219,511
Contingency Fund 150,000 0 150,000
Grand Total - Office of Governor 9,334,918 34,593 9,369,511
Commission for Human Rights
General Revenues 2,249,158 36,699 2,285,857
Federal Funds 523,529 (25,306) 498,223
Grand Total - Commission for Human Rights 2,772,687 11,393 2,784,080
Public Utilities Commission
Federal Funds 753,555 17,552 771,107
LC004135 - Page 14 of 51

Restricted Receipts 14,754,719 142,294 14,897,013
Grand Total - Public Utilities Commission 15,508,274 159,846 15,668,120
Executive Office of Health and Human Services
Central Management
General Revenues 32,413,726 (272,850) 32,140,876
Provided that of this amount, $900,000 will be for Mobile Response and Stabilization
Services for uninsured and underinsured child and youth and cover services and costs not otherwise
reimbursed. Also $500,000 is for Thundermist’s Family Residency Program contingent upon
receiving federal funds and $150,000 will be for an Olmstead Plan Coordinator.
All-Payer Claims Database 509,950 31,160 541,110
Health System Planning and Overtight 777,260 (82,610) 694,650
Medicaid Enterprise System 1,873,838 (571,153) 1,302,685
Medicaid Management Information System 6,064,700 1,668,302 7,733,002
Unified Health Infrastructure 22,368,654 (286,326) 22,082,328
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 70,793,907 8,788,961 79,582,868
Provided that of this amount, $1,960,784 shall be for statewide interagency initiatives to
implement and support the community engagement requirements of the federal reconciliation bill
known as H.R. 1, to be developed and administered in coordination with the Department of Human
Services and the Department of Labor and Training, to the extent compliance with guidance from
Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services.
All-Payer Claims Database 10,212,239 (2,718,244) 7,493,995
Health System Planning and Oversight 153,750 1,583,250 1,737,000
Medicaid Enterprise System 12,364,541 (8,830,381) 3,534,160
Medicaid Management Information System 19,566,585 8,449,860 28,016,445
Unified Health Infrastructure Project 56,336,615 (1,814,003) 54,522,612
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics 205,295 1,703,127 1,908,422
Restricted Receipts 15,463,598 20,275,836 35,739,434
Total - Central Management 249,104,658 27,924,929 277,029,587
Medical Assistance
General Revenues
Managed Care 464,278,305 (1,559,842) 462,718,463
Hospitals 136,238,010 1,966,367 138,204,377
LC004135 - Page 15 of 51

Nursing Facilities 204,266,507 (10,382,507) 193,884,000
Home and Community Based Services 125,703,952 (3,895,152) 121,808,800
Other Services 160,879,834 (26,382,204) 134,497,630
Pharmacy 100,069,654 (4,519,415) 95,550,239
Rhody Health 234,976,854 31,101,026 266,077,880
Federal Funds
Managed Care 653,184,013 (9,102,476) 644,081,537
Hospitals 285,888,183 (1,992,560) 283,895,623
Nursing Facilities 273,055,474 (13,939,474) 259,116,000
Home and Community Based Services 168,075,434 (5,284,234) 162,791,200
Other Services 796,373,214 (34,112,512) 762,260,702
Pharmacy 4,130,346 (3,580,585) 549,761
Rhody Health 326,578,917 41,434,871 368,013,788
Other Programs 32,611,481 12,788,519 45,400,000
Restricted Receipts 11,021,948 (1,615,734) 9,406,214
Total - Medical Assistance 3,977,332,126 (29,075,912) 3,948,256,214
Grand Total – Executive Office of Health
and Human Services 4,226,436,784 (1,150,983) 4,225,285,801
Children, Youth and Families
Central Management
General Revenues 17,937,159 2,411,228 20,348,387
The director of the department of children, youth and families shall provide to the speaker
of the house and president of the senate at least every ninety (90) days beginning September 30,
2025, a report on the process to maintain accreditation in accordance with § 42-72-5.3. The report
shall, at minimum, provide data regarding recruitment and retention efforts, including maintaining
a diverse workforce, documentation of newly filled and vacated positions, and progress in reducing
worker caseloads.
It shall also contain the number of filled full-time equivalent positions compared to the
department’s authorization and disaggregated by job classification, and as compared to the staffing
recommended in the October 1, 2020 accreditation plan that was funded beginning in the fiscal
year 2022 budget. The report shall also include information on turnover assumptions, expressed
as funded positions compared to filled and authorized.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 15,237,654 (1,294,930) 13,942,724
LC004135 - Page 16 of 51

Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Provider Workforce Stabilization 0 257,093 257,093
Total - Central Management 33,174,813 1,373,391 34,548,204
Children's Behavioral Health Services
General Revenues 7,109,636 1,963,945 9,073,581
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 8,824,070 (440,778) 8,383,292
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility 0 6,561,123 6,561,123
Total - Children's Behavioral Health Services 15,933,706 8,084,290 24,017,996
Youth Development Services
General Revenues 25,678,366 1,800,057 27,478,423
Federal Funds 647,931 (488,161) 159,770
Restricted Receipts 1,500 (1,500) 0
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Training School Asset Protection 250,000 323,459 573,459
Residential Treatment Facilities 11,000,000 9,942,880 20,942,880
Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility
Modifications 0 5,560,822 5,560,822
Total - Youth Development Services 37,577,797 17,137,557 54,715,354
Child Welfare
General Revenues 211,849,897 (6,194,805) 205,655,092
Federal Funds 93,910,710 (525,445) 93,385,265
Restricted Receipts 1,743,471 127,133 1,870,604
Total - Child Welfare 307,504,078 (6,593,117) 300,910,961
Higher Education Incentive Grants
General Revenues 200,000 0 200,000
Provided that these funds and any unexpended or unencumbered previous years’ funding
are to be used exclusively to fund awards to eligible youth.
Grand Total - Children, Youth and
Families 394,390,394 20,002,121 414,392,515
Health
Central Management
LC004135 - Page 17 of 51

General Revenues
General Revenues 2,588,732 (518,634) 2,070,098
Of this amount, $50,000 is to support the Gloria Gemma Breast Cancer Resource
Foundation and the organization’s new survivorship and well-being center in Lincoln, RI.
Psychiatry Resource Network 750,000 123 750,123
Primary Care Training Sites Program 2,000,000 502,422 2,502,422
Provided that unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2026 are hereby
reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Federal Funds 4,884,431 853,865 5,738,296
Restricted Receipts 22,233,391 6,289,146 28,522,537
Provided that the disbursement of any indirect cost recoveries on federal grants budgeted
in this line item that are derived from grants authorized under The Coronavirus Preparedness and
Response Supplemental Appropriations Act (P.L. 116-123); The Families First Coronavirus
Response Act (P.L. 116-127); The Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (P.L. 116-
136); The Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care Enhancement Act (P.L. 116-139); the
Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (P.L. 116-260); and the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
(P.L. 117-2), are hereby subject to the review and prior approval of the director of management and
budget. No obligation or expenditure of these funds shall take place without such approval.
Total - Central Management 32,456,554 7,126,922 39,583,476
Community Health and Equity
General Revenues 2,051,358 718 2,052,076
Federal Funds 88,096,432 2,942,680 91,039,112
Restricted Receipts 67,695,968 (6,358,963) 61,337,005
Total - Community Health and Equity 157,843,758 (3,415,565) 154,428,193
Environmental Health
General Revenues 6,836,896 383,097 7,219,993
Federal Funds 14,433,189 (843,484) 13,589,705
Restricted Receipts 1,104,785 53,291 1,158,076
Total - Environmental Health 22,374,870 (407,096) 21,967,774
Health Laboratories
General Revenues 9,514,520 1,015,129 10,529,649
Federal Funds 2,666,663 225,700 2,892,363
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
LC004135 - Page 18 of 51

Health Laboratories & Medical Examiner
Equipment 400,000 550,736 950,736
New Health Laboratory Building 8,363,883 6,742,388 15,106,271
Total - Health Laboratories 20,945,066 8,533,953 29,479,019
State Medical Examiners
General Revenues 4,521,784 2,136 4,523,920
Federal Funds 67,325 0 67,325
Total – State Medical Examiners 4,589,109 2,136 4,591,245
Healthcare Quality and Safety
General Revenues 7,868,321 (16,840) 7,851,481
Federal Funds 6,746,561 728,319 7,474,880
Restricted Receipts 1,199,564 (242,752) 956,812
Total – Healthcare Quality and Safety 15,814,446 468,727 16,283,173
Policy, Information and Communications
General Revenues 2,785,613 (214,025) 2,571,588
Provided that $200,000 of this amount and its corresponding federal match is used for loan
repayment assistance specifically for primary care physicians and pediatricians through the Health
Professional Loan Repayment Program authorized by § 23-14.1.
Federal Funds 5,593,898 145,097 5,738,995
Restricted Receipts 842,433 (42,630) 799,803
Total - Policy, Information and
Communications 9,221,944 (111,558) 9,110,386
Emergency Preparedness and Infectious Disease
General Revenues 1,907,851 (14,678) 1,893,173
Federal Funds 15,196,529 1,691,217 16,887,746
Total – Emergency Preparedness and
Infectious Disease 17,104,380 1,676,539 18,780,919
COVID-19
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 15,176,647 2,384,012 17,560,659
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
COVID-19 Operational Support 0 229,342 229,342
Total – COVID-19 15,176,647 2,613,354 17,790,001
Grand Total - Health 295,526,774 16,487,412 312,014,186
LC004135 - Page 19 of 51

Human Services
Central Management
General Revenues 8,050,831 (1,391,873) 6,658,958
Of this amount, $400,000 is to support the domestic violence prevention fund to provide
direct services through the Coalition Against Domestic Violence, $25,000 for the Center for
Southeast Asians, $450,000 to support Project Reach activities provided by the RI Alliance of Boys
and Girls Clubs, $300,000 is for outreach and supportive services through Day One, $950,000 is
for food collection and distribution through the Rhode Island Community Food Bank, $500,000 for
services provided to the homeless at Crossroads Rhode Island, $600,000 for the Community Action
Fund, $250,000 is for the Institute for the Study and Practice of Nonviolence’s Reduction Strategy,
$200,000 to provide operational support to the United Way’s 211 system, $125,000 is to support
services provided to the immigrant and refugee population through Higher Ground International,
$50,000 is for services provided to refugees through the Refugee Dream Center and $150,000 for
the Substance Use and Mental Health Leadership Council of RI.
The director of the department of human services shall provide to the speaker of the house,
president of the senate, and chairs of the house and senate finance committees at least every sixty
(60) days beginning August 1, 2022, a report on its progress in recruiting and retaining customer
serving staff. The report shall include: documentation of newly filled and vacated positions,
including lateral transfers, position titles, civil service information, including numbers of eligible
and available candidates, plans for future testing and numbers of eligible and available candidates
resulting from such testing, impacts on caseload backlogs and call center wait times, as well as
other pertinent information as determined by the director.
Federal Funds 8,064,314 452,931 8,517,245
Of this amount, $3.0 million is to sustain Early Head Start and Head Start programs.
Restricted Receipts 300,000 1,060,207 1,360,207
Total - Central Management 16,415,145 121,265 16,536,410
Child Support Enforcement
General Revenues 4,390,046 110,877 4,500,923
Federal Funds 10,229,053 (2,092,814) 8,136,239
Restricted Receipts 3,816,099 391,310 4,207,409
Total - Child Support Enforcement 18,435,198 (1,590,627) 16,844,571
Individual and Family Support
General Revenues 35,143,366 (581,136) 34,562,230
Federal Funds
LC004135 - Page 20 of 51

Federal Funds 128,579,088 10,709,211 139,288,299
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Child Care Support 0 1,004,309 1,004,309
Restricted Receipts 115,000 (15,000) 100,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Blind Vending Facilities 165,000 0 165,000
Total - Individual and Family Support 164,002,454 11,117,384 175,119,838
Office of Veterans Services
General Revenues 33,499,864 11,401 33,511,265
Of this amount, $200,000 is to provide support services through veterans’ organizations,
$50,000 is to support Operation Stand Down, and $100,000 is to support the Veterans Services
Officers (VSO) program through the Veterans of Foreign Wars.
Federal Funds 15,752,830 1,624,289 17,377,119
Restricted Receipts 1,725,342 (393,921) 1,331,421
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Veterans Home Asset Protection 665,000 442,224 1,107,224
Veterans Memorial Cemetery Asset Protection 300,000 415,003 715,003
Total - Office of Veterans Services 51,943,036 2,098,996 54,042,032
Health Care Eligibility
General Revenues 10,511,087 513,511 11,024,598
Federal Funds 16,662,419 309,990 16,972,409
Total - Health Care Eligibility 27,173,506 823,501 27,997,007
Supplemental Security Income Program
General Revenues 16,680,780 (84,780) 16,596,000
Rhode Island Works
General Revenues 9,891,538 (10,142) 9,881,396
Federal Funds 109,225,738 (8,220,937) 101,004,801
Total - Rhode Island Works 119,117,276 (8,231,079) 110,886,197
Other Programs
General Revenues 2,231,840 3,874,558 6,106,398
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 382,432,873 (36,822,408) 345,610,465
LC004135 - Page 21 of 51

Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Retail SNAP Incentives Pilot Program 0 1,350 1,350
Restricted Receipts 8,000 350,000 358,000
Total - Other Programs 384,672,713 (32,596,500) 352,076,213
Office of Healthy Aging
General Revenues 15,623,340 (1,284,103) 14,339,237
Of this amount, $325,000 is to provide elder services, including respite, through the
Diocese of Providence; $40,000 is for ombudsman services provided by the Alliance for Long
Term Care in accordance with chapter 66.7 of title 42; and $1,600,000 is for Senior Services
Support and $730,000 is for elderly nutrition, of which $680,000 is for Meals on Wheels.
Federal Funds 19,011,572 (1,361,734) 17,649,838
Restricted Receipt 46,200 138,068 184,268
Other Funds
Intermodal Surface Transportation Fund 4,267,406 19,460 4,286,866
The Office shall reimburse the Rhode Island public transit authority for the elderly/disabled
transportation program expenses no later than fifteen (15) days of the authority’s submission of a
request for payment.
Total - Office of Healthy Aging 38,948,518 (2,488,309) 36,460,209
Grand Total - Human Services 837,388,626 (30,830,149) 806,558,477
Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Central Management
General Revenues 8,058,892 2,105,705 10,164,597
Federal Funds 2,631,491 (829,069) 1,802,422
Restricted Receipts 559,071 1,186,952 1,746,023
Total - Central Management 11,249,454 2,463,588 13,713,042
Services for the Developmentally Disabled
General Revenues 218,735,702 5,103,858 223,839,560
Provided that of this general revenue funding, an amount certified by the department shall
be expended on certain community-based department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH) developmental disability private provider and self-directed
consumer direct care service worker raises and associated payroll costs as authorized by BHDDH
and to finance the new services rates implemented by BHDDH pursuant to the Consent Decree
Addendum. Any increase for direct support staff and residential or other community-based setting
must first receive the approval of BHDDH.
LC004135 - Page 22 of 51

Provided further that of this general revenue funding, $928,200 shall be expended on a
Transformation Fund to be used for I/DD integrated day activities and supported employment
services, or which a total of $650,000 shall be expended specifically on those who self-direct for
creation of regional service advisement models and pool of substitute staff. All unexpended or
unencumbered balances of this designation at the end of the fiscal year shall be reappropriated to
the ensuing fiscal year and made immediately available for the same purpose.
Federal Funds 286,950,145 2,911,578 289,861,723
Provided that of this federal funding, an amount certified by the department shall be
expended on certain community-based department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH) developmental disability private provider and self-directed
consumer direct care service worker raises and associated payroll costs as authorized by BHDDH
and to finance the new services rates implemented by BHDDH pursuant to the Consent Decree
Addendum. Any increase for direct support staff and residential or other community-based setting
must first receive the approval of BHDDH.
Provided further that of this federal funding, $371,800 shall be expended on a
Transformation Fund to be used for I/DD integrated day activities and supported employment
services. All unexpended or unencumbered balances of this designation at the end of the fiscal year
shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal year and made immediately available for the same
purpose.
Restricted Receipts 1,300,866 711,700 2,012,566
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
DD Residential Support 100,000 195,618 295,618
Total - Services for the Developmentally
Disabled 507,086,713 8,922,754 516,009,467
Behavioral Healthcare Services
General Revenues 4,817,486 397,689 5,215,175
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 32,467,553 3,856,223 36,323,776
Provided that $250,000 from Social Services Block Grant funds is awarded to The
Providence Center to coordinate with Oasis Wellness and Recovery Center for its support and
services program offered to individuals with behavioral health issues.
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
9-8-8 Hotline 1,800,000 612,677 2,412,677
LC004135 - Page 23 of 51

Crisis Intervention Trainings 0 1,217,506 1,217,506
Restricted Receipts 5,416,046 10,184,282 15,600,328
Provided that $450,000 $486,850 from the opioid stewardship fund is distributed equally
to the seven regional substance abuse prevention task forces to fund priorities determined by each
Task Force.
Total - Behavioral Healthcare Services 44,501,085 16,268,377 60,769,462
Hospital and Community Rehabilitative Services
General Revenues 53,723,206 302,664 54,025,870
Federal Funds 61,515,889 (1,381,094) 60,134,795
Restricted Receipts 4,634,700 889,515 5,524,215
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Hospital Equipment 300,000 312,311 612,311
Total - Hospital and Community Rehabilitative
Services 120,173,795 123,396 120,297,191
State of RI Psychiatric Hospital
General Revenues 33,443,552 383,865 33,827,417
Restricted Receipts 144,000 0 144,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
RISPH Equipment 100,000 0 100,000
Total - State of RI Psychiatric Hospital 33,687,552 383,865 34,071,417
Grand Total - Behavioral Healthcare,
Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals 716,698,599 28,161,980 744,860,579
Office of the Child Advocate
General Revenues 2,264,613 (79,603) 2,185,010
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
General Revenues 786,233 (18,570) 767,663
Restricted Receipts 142,921 66,368 209,289
Grand Total - Comm. On Deaf and
Hard-of-Hearing 929,154 47,798 976,952
Governor’s Commission on Disabilities
General Revenues
General Revenues 870,754 24,087 894,841
LC004135 - Page 24 of 51

Livable Home Modification Grant Program 515,278 890,565 1,405,843
Provided that this will be used for home modification and accessibility enhancements to
construct, retrofit, and/or renovate residences to allow individuals to remain in community settings.
This will be in consultation with the executive office of health and human services. All unexpended
or unencumbered balances, at the end of the fiscal year, shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal
year, and made immediately available for the same purpose.
Federal Funds 340,067 25 340,092
Restricted Receipts 79,943 (12,753) 67,190
Grand Total - Governor’s Commission
on Disabilities 1,806,042 901,924 2,707,966
Office of the Mental Health Advocate
General Revenues 1,117,164 (184,723) 932,441
Elementary and Secondary Education
Administration of the Comprehensive Education Strategy
General Revenues 34,222,798 4,679,856 38,902,654
Provided that $90,000 be allocated to support the hospital school at Hasbro Children’s
Hospital pursuant to § 16-7-20; $395,000 be allocated to support child opportunity zones through
agreements with the department of elementary and secondary education to strengthen education,
health and social services for students and their families as a strategy to accelerate student
achievement; $450,000 and 3.0 full-time equivalent positions be allocated to support a special
education function to facilitate individualized education program (IEP) and 504 services; and
further provided that $130,000 be allocated to City Year for the Whole School Whole Child
Program, which provides individualized support to at-risk students; and further provided that all
unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2026, relating to the Learn365RI program
are hereby reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Provided further that of this amount, $1,860,000 is allocated toward a special education
settlement to provide compensatory special education services, related administrative costs, and
attorneys’ fees pursuant to a legal settlement authorized by the Rhode Island board of education,
of which all unexpended or unencumbered balances at the end of the fiscal year shall be
reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal year and made immediately available for the same purpose until
the requirements of the settlement agreement have been satisfied.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 255,593,813 15,223,355 270,817,168
Provided that $684,000 from the department’s administrative share of Individuals with
LC004135 - Page 25 of 51

Disabilities Education Act funds be allocated to the Paul V. Sherlock Center on Disabilities to
support the Rhode Island Vision Education and Services Program.
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Adult Education Providers 128,373 1,410,989 1,539,362
Out of School Time Education Providers 0 2,047,238 2,047,238
Restricted Receipts
Restricted Receipts 1,724,551 466,348 2,190,899
HRIC Adult Education Grants 3,500,000 0 3,500,000
Total - Admin. of the Comprehensive Ed.
Strategy 295,169,535 23,827,786 318,997,321
Davies Career and Technical School
General Revenues 18,532,152 951,765 19,483,917
Federal Funds 924,285 312,154 1,236,439
Restricted Receipts 5,471,394 1,212 5,472,606
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Davies School HVAC 50,000 1,151,286 1,201,286
Davies School Asset Protection 750,000 149,614 899,614
Davies School Healthcare Classroom
Renovations 6,911,727 (6,911,727) 0
Davies School Wing Renovation 34,515,423 (25,892,838) 8,622,585
Total - Davies Career and Technical School 67,154,981 (30,238,534) 36,916,447
RI School for the Deaf
General Revenues 8,809,938 19,673 8,829,611
Federal Funds 271,830 (46,465) 225,365
Restricted Receipts 1,097,000 505,000 1,602,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
School for the Deaf Asset Protection 100,000 311,780 411,780
Total - RI School for the Deaf 10,278,768 789,988 11,068,756
Metropolitan Career and Technical School
General Revenues 12,966,926 0 12,966,926
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
LC004135 - Page 26 of 51

MET School Asset Protection 250,000 1,971,348 2,221,348
Total - Metropolitan Career and Technical
School 13,216,926 1,971,348 15,188,274
Education Aid
General Revenues 1,272,230,353 38,186 1,272,268,539
Provided that the criteria for the allocation of early childhood funds shall prioritize pre-
kindergarten seats and classrooms for four-year-olds whose family income is at or below one
hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of federal poverty guidelines and who reside in communities
with higher concentrations of low performing schools.
Restricted Receipts 38,952,936 9,630,716 48,583,652
Total - Education Aid 1,311,183,289 9,668,902 1,320,852,191
Central Falls School District
General Revenues 54,567,882 0 54,567,882
School Construction Aid
General Revenues
School Housing Aid 119,887,755 0 119,887,755
Teachers' Retirement
General Revenues 137,991,006 (4,390,928) 133,600,078
Grand Total - Elementary and Secondary
Education 2,009,450,142 1,628,562 2,011,078,704
Public Higher Education
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner
General Revenues 33,322,291 28,338 33,350,629
Provided that $455,000 shall be allocated to Onward We Learn pursuant to § 16-70-5,
$75,000 shall be allocated to Best Buddies Rhode Island to support its programs for children with
developmental and intellectual disabilities. It is also provided that $7,367,460 $7,516,726 shall be
allocated to the Rhode Island promise scholarship program; $151,410 shall be used to support
Rhode Island’s membership in the New England Board of Higher Education; $5,476,723
$5,237,166 shall be allocated to the Rhode Island hope scholarship program; and $100,000 shall be
allocated to the Rhode Island School for Progressive Education to support access to higher
education opportunities for teachers of color.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 5,582,208 (212,342) 5,369,866
Guaranty Agency Administration 60,000 0 60,000
LC004135 - Page 27 of 51

Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Fresh Start Scholarship 0 1,199,287 1,199,287
RI Reconnect 0 4,600,385 4,600,385
RIC Cybersecurity Center 0 475,006 475,006
Restricted Receipts
Restricted Receipts 8,383,189 (65,235) 8,317,954
Tuition Savings Program - Scholarships
and Grants 3,400,000 0 3,400,000
Other Funds
Nursing Education Center - Operating 3,295,810 69,836 3,365,646
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
WEC Expansion - Annex Site 1,220,000 (820,000) 400,000
Total - Office of Postsecondary
Commissioner 55,263,498 5,275,275 60,538,773
University of Rhode Island
General Revenues
General Revenues 115,308,021 (68,907) 115,239,114
Provided that in order to leverage federal funding and support economic development,
$700,000 shall be allocated to the small business development center, $125,000 shall be allocated
to the Institute for Labor Studies & Research, $50,000 shall be allocated to Special Olympics Rhode
Island to support its mission of providing athletic opportunities for individuals with intellectual and
developmental disabilities, and $874,069 shall be used to support programming related to career
readiness, career placement, internships, and work-based learning.
Debt Service 31,526,482 3,228,750 34,755,232
RI State Forensics Laboratory 1,803,420 0 1,803,420
Other Funds
University and College Funds 847,374,010 (1,497,801) 845,876,209
Debt - Dining Services 781,957 4,070 786,027
Debt - Education and General 5,076,811 (700) 5,076,111
Debt - Health Services 16,032 (50) 15,982
Debt - Housing Loan Funds 13,863,455 24,359 13,887,814
Debt - Memorial Union 758,853 1,792 760,645
Debt - Ryan Center 2,888,322 (511,944) 2,376,378
Debt - Parking Authority 889,077 (79,798) 809,279
LC004135 - Page 28 of 51

URI Restricted Debt Service - Energy
Conservation 536,169 0 536,169
URI Debt Service - Energy Conservation 1,956,906 0 1,956,906
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 14,606,536 3,313,057 17,919,593
Mechanical, Electric, and Plumbing
Improvements 7,293,838 (1,989,199) 5,304,639
Fire Protection Academic Buildings 1,641,903 1,789,836 3,431,739
Bay Campus 8,146,722 (43,200) 8,103,522
Athletics Complex 33,942,707 3,377,715 37,320,422
Provided that total Rhode Island capital plan funds provide no more than 80.0 percent of
the total project.
Stormwater Management 4,252,678 (1,048,324) 3,204,354
PFAS Removal Water Treatment Plant 13,759,400 (8,973,055) 4,786,345
Campus Accessibility 2,300,000 0 2,300,000
Building Envelope Improvements 3,000,000 0 3,000,000
Total - University of Rhode Island 1,111,723,299 (2,473,399) 1,109,249,900
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as
of June 30, 2026 relating to the university of Rhode Island are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year
2027.
Rhode Island College
General Revenues
General Revenues 70,714,722 (95,387) 70,619,335
Provided that $464,377 shall be used to support programming related to career readiness,
career placement, internships, and work-based learning.
Debt Service 7,933,336 796,740 8,730,076
Rhode Island Vision Education and Services
Program 1,800,000 0 1,800,000
Other Funds
University and College Funds 120,309,539 5,949,928 126,259,467
Debt - Education and General 1,478,585 (762,376) 716,209
Debt - Student Union 212,200 0 212,000
Debt - G.O. Debt Service 1,585,353 0 1,585,353
Debt - Energy Conservation 762,375 0 762,375
LC004135 - Page 29 of 51

Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 5,950,000 5,136,325 11,086,325
Infrastructure Modernization 5,675,000 6,172,208 11,847,208
Phase IV: Whipple Hall 0 500,000 500,000
Total - Rhode Island College 216,421,110 17,697,438 234,118,548
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as
of June 30, 2026, relating to Rhode Island college are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year 2027.
Community College of Rhode Island
General Revenues
General Revenues 63,740,346 555,615 64,295,961
Provided that $391,175 shall be used to support programming related to career readiness,
career placement, internships, and work-based learning.
Debt Service 1,097,898 (5,760) 1,092,138
Restricted Receipts 953,442 15,333 968,775
Other Funds
University and College Funds 114,885,691 4,564,291 119,449,982
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 3,469,452 1,222,758 4,692,210
Data, Cabling, and Power Infrastructure 5,750,000 (5,000,000) 750,000
Flanagan Campus Renovations 3,200,000 149,954 3,349,954
CCRI Renovation and Modernization
Phase I 15,000,000 1,512,602 16,512,602
CCRI Renovation and Modernization
Phase II - IV 6,100,000 (5,200,000) 900,000
CCRI Accessibility Improvements 290,000 10,000 300,000
Total - Community College of RI 214,486,829 (2,175,207) 212,311,622
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as
of June 30, 2026, relating to the community college of Rhode Island are hereby reappropriated to
fiscal year 2027.
Grand Total - Public Higher Education 1,597,894,736 18,324,107 1,616,218,843
RI State Council on the Arts
General Revenues
Operating Support 1,224,685 1,443 1,226,128
Grants 1,190,000 0 1,190,000
LC004135 - Page 30 of 51

Provided that $400,000 be provided to support the operational costs of WaterFire
Providence art installations.
Federal Funds 1,022,711 70,862 1,093,573
Restricted Receipts 115,058 (115,058) 0
Other Funds
Art for Public Facilities 690,000 11,000 701,000
Grand Total - RI State Council on the Arts 4,242,454 (31,753) 4,210,701
RI Atomic Energy Commission
General Revenues 1,278,282 3,909 1,282,191
Restricted Receipts 25,036 0 25,036
Other Funds
URI Sponsored Research 361,177 (33,093) 328,084
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 50,000 7,966 57,966
Grand Total - RI Atomic Energy
Commission 1,714,495 (21,218) 1,693,277
RI Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission
General Revenues 1,969,751 47,282 2,017,033
Provided that $30,000 support the operational costs of the Fort Adams Trust’s restoration
activities and that $25,000 shall be allocated to Rhode Island Slave History Medallions.
Federal Funds 822,451 (15,198) 807,253
Restricted Receipts 511,827 0 511,827
Other Funds
RIDOT Project Review 144,602 (4,202) 140,400
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Archaeological Collection Facility 0 50,000 50,000
Grand Total - RI Historical Preservation and
Heritage Comm. 3,448,631 77,882 3,526,513
Attorney General
Criminal
General Revenues 23,147,524 643,171 23,790,695
Federal Funds 3,404,012 (215,563) 3,188,449
Restricted Receipts 2,096,085 (143,314) 1,952,771
Total - Criminal 28,647,621 284,294 28,931,915
LC004135 - Page 31 of 51

Civil
General Revenues 7,301,706 (856,568) 6,445,138
Federal Funds 100,000 25,553 125,553
Restricted Receipts 4,724,238 49,076 4,773,314
Total - Civil 12,125,944 (781,939) 11,344,005
Bureau of Criminal Identification
General Revenues 2,440,742 26,983 2,467,725
Federal Funds 64,547 (30,000) 34,547
Restricted Receipts 1,329,498 607,284 1,936,782
Total - Bureau of Criminal Identification 3,834,787 604,267 4,439,054
General
General Revenues 5,354,455 331,878 5,686,333
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Building Renovations and Repairs 2,525,000 0 2,525,000
Total - General 7,879,455 331,878 8,211,333
Grand Total - Attorney General 52,487,807 438,500 52,926,307
Corrections
Central Management
General Revenues 24,875,748 1,110,252 25,986,000
Federal Funds 0 177,680 177,680
Total – Central Management 24,875,748 1,287,932 26,163,680
Parole Board
General Revenues 1,673,257 (61,155) 1,612,102
Custody and Security
General Revenues 182,260,831 (2,486,473) 179,774,358
Federal Funds 1,371,846 1,201,698 2,573,544
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Intake Service Center HVAC 27,818,335 (782,805) 27,035,530
Total - Custody and Security 211,451,012 (2,067,580) 209,383,432
Institutional Support
General Revenues 40,099,600 724,402 40,824,002
Other Funds
LC004135 - Page 32 of 51

Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 8,277,650 2,100,000 10,377,650
Correctional Facilities – Renovations 3,179,677 (3,179,677) 0
Total - Institutional Support 51,556,927 (355,275) 51,201,652
Institutional Based Rehab/Population Management
General Revenues 15,027,101 (468,665) 14,558,436
Provided that $1,050,000 be allocated to Crossroads Rhode Island for sex offender
discharge planning.
The director of the department of corrections shall provide to the speaker of the house and
president of the senate at least every ninety (90) days beginning September 1, 2022, a report on
efforts to modernize the correctional industries program. The report shall, at minimum, provide
data on the past ninety (90) days regarding program participation; changes made in programming
to more closely align with industry needs; new or terminated partnerships with employers,
nonprofits, and advocacy groups; current program expenses and revenues; and the employment
status of all persons on the day of discharge from department care who participated in the
correctional industries program.
Federal Funds 386,256 391,550 777,806
Restricted Receipts 1,300,000 193,379 1,493,379
Total - Institutional Based Rehab/Population
Mgt. 16,713,357 116,264 16,829,621
Healthcare Services
General Revenues 37,051,880 3,124,127 40,176,007
Community Corrections
General Revenues 23,026,186 (288,024) 22,738,162
Federal Funds 0 47,814 47,814
Restricted Receipts 3,091 (604) 2,487
Total - Community Corrections 23,029,277 (240,814) 22,788,463
Grand Total - Corrections 366,351,458 1,803,499 368,154,957
Judiciary
Supreme Court
General Revenues
General Revenues 36,665,481 1,811,372 38,476,853
Provided however, that no more than $1,430,073 in combined total shall be offset to the
public defender’s office, the attorney general’s office, the department of corrections, the department
LC004135 - Page 33 of 51

of children, youth and families, and the department of public safety for square-footage occupancy
costs in public courthouses and further provided that $500,000 be allocated to the Rhode Island
Coalition Against Domestic Violence for the domestic abuse court advocacy project pursuant to §
12-29-7 and that $90,000 be allocated to Rhode Island Legal Services, Inc. to provide housing and
eviction defense to indigent individuals.
Defense of Indigents 7,875,432 (20,000) 7,855,432
Federal Funds 205,395 (74,085) 131,310
Restricted Receipts 4,312,243 (59,477) 4,252,766
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Judicial Complexes - HVAC 500,000 5,885 505,885
Judicial Complexes Asset Protection 1,500,000 22,618 1,522,618
Judicial Complexes Fan Coil Unit
Replacements 500,000 3,082 503,082
Garrahy Courthouse Restoration 1,125,000 18,183 1,143,183
Total - Supreme Court 52,683,551 1,707,578 54,391,129
Judicial Tenure and Discipline
General Revenues 188,686 89 188,775
Superior Court
General Revenues 30,216,228 66,823 30,283,051
Restricted Receipts 325,000 0 325,000
Total - Superior Court 30,541,228 66,823 30,608,051
Family Court
General Revenues 29,167,951 66,679 29,234,630
Federal Funds 5,392,549 (421,847) 4,970,702
Total - Family Court 34,560,500 (355,168) 34,205,332
District Court
General Revenues 17,697,776 73,018 17,770,794
Federal Funds 696,951 (374,123) 322,828
Restricted Receipts 60,000 0 60,000
Total - District Court 18,454,727 (301,105) 18,153,622
Traffic Tribunal
General Revenues 11,704,985 36,532 11,741,517
Workers' Compensation Court
LC004135 - Page 34 of 51

Restricted Receipts 11,090,756 (7,217) 11,083,539
Grand Total - Judiciary 159,224,433 1,147,532 160,371,965
Military Staff
General Revenues 3,424,058 84,034 3,508,092
Federal Funds 28,982,412 38,249,854 67,232,266
Restricted Receipts
RI Military Family Relief Fund 55,000 0 55,000
RING Counterdrug Program 11,000 0 11,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Aviation Readiness Center 4,538,673 2,979,941 7,518,614
Asset Protection 2,564,675 1,707,192 4,271,867
Quonset Airport Runway Reconstruction 446,663 380,922 827,585
Counter-Drug Training Facility 1,025,250 1,558,558 2,583,808
Squadron Ops Facility (Air Guard) 600,000 0 600,000
Quonset Air National Guard HQ Facility 0 1,893,948 1,893,948
Grand Total - Military Staff 41,647,731 46,854,449 88,502,180
Public Safety
Central Management
General Revenues 1,899,154 9,487,402 11,386,556
Provided that $400,000 $558,089 shall be allocated to support the Family Service of Rhode
Island’s GO Team program of on-scene support to children who are victims of violence and other
traumas. It is also provided that $9,047,396 shall be allocated as the state contribution for the
statewide body-worn camera program, subject to all program and reporting rules, regulations,
policies, and guidelines prescribed in the Rhode Island General Laws. Notwithstanding the
provision of § 35-3-15 of the general laws, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June
30, 2026 from this appropriation are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year 2027.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 18,479,969 (4,076,435) 14,403,534
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Support for Survivors of Domestic Violence 29,753 4,501,209 4,530,962
Restricted Receipts 738,584 220,244 958,828
Total - Central Management 21,147,460 10,132,420 31,279,880
E-911 Emergency Telephone System
LC004135 - Page 35 of 51

Restricted Receipts 10,730,138 243,942 10,974,080
Security Services
General Revenues 33,685,555 (1,309,484) 32,376,071
Municipal Police Training Academy
General Revenues 349,440 16,020 365,460
Federal Funds 417,455 71,773 489,228
Total - Municipal Police Training Academy 766,895 87,793 854,688
State Police
General Revenues 96,907,970 1,162,633 98,070,603
Federal Funds 8,126,146 2,732,983 10,859,129
Restricted Receipts 2,845,158 0 2,845,158
Other Funds
Airport Corporation Assistance 151,310 (540) 150,770
Road Construction Reimbursement 3,355,100 2,200,000 5,555,100
Weight and Measurement Reimbursement 402,401 226,281 628,682
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
DPS Asset Protection 1,205,000 1,911,587 3,116,587
Southern Barracks 16,750,000 (20) 16,749,980
Training Academy Upgrades 1,550,000 325,148 1,875,148
Statewide Communications System Network 245,048 (245,048) 0
Total - State Police 131,538,133 8,313,024 139,851,157
Grand Total - Public Safety 197,868,181 17,467,695 215,335,876
Office of Public Defender
General Revenues 18,178,679 11,095 18,189,774
Federal Funds 85,035 0 85,035
Grand Total - Office of Public Defender 18,263,714 11,095 18,274,809
Emergency Management Agency
General Revenues 7,457,256 186,926 7,644,182
Provided that of this general revenue amount, $250,000 is to be used to cover security
expenses incurred by state agencies associated with the FIFA 2026 World Cup that would not be
reimbursed by other available funding sources. All unexpended or unencumbered balances of this
designation, as of June 30, 2026, shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal year and made
immediately available for the same purpose.
Federal Funds 34,906,616 12,840,348 47,746,964
LC004135 - Page 36 of 51

Restricted Receipts 428,308 213,109 641,417
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
RI Statewide Communications Infrastructure 315,404 85,162 400,566
RI Statewide Communications Network Tower 550,000 0 550,000
State Emergency Ops Center 0 64,000 64,000
Grand Total - Emergency Management
Agency 43,657,584 13,389,545 57,047,129
Environmental Management
Office of the Director
General Revenues 9,446,875 (127,764) 9,319,111
Of this general revenue amount, $180,000 is appropriated to the conservation districts and
$100,000 is appropriated to the Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island for a
veterinarian at the Wildlife Clinic of Rhode Island.
Federal Funds 354,975 329,383 684,358
Restricted Receipts 5,930,220 1,150,812 7,081,032
Total - Office of the Director 15,732,070 1,352,431 17,084,501
Natural Resources
General Revenues 32,325,750 80,705 32,406,455
Provided that of this general revenue amount, $150,000 is to be used for marine mammal
response activities in conjunction with matching federal funds.
Federal Funds 31,528,201 264,097 31,792,298
Restricted Receipts 6,185,022 721,371 6,906,393
Other Funds
DOT Recreational Projects 762,000 26,547 788,547
Blackstone Bike Path Design 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Dam Repair 6,815,000 (6,422,589) 392,411
Fort Adams Rehabilitation 500,000 216,595 716,595
Port of Galilee 20,500,000 (5,779,101) 14,720,899
Newport Pier Upgrades 500,000 502,328 1,002,328
Recreation Facilities Asset Protection 750,000 0 750,000
Recreational Facilities Improvements 2,900,000 4,735,607 7,635,607
Natural Resources Office and Visitor's Center 1,836,709 97,368 1,934,077
LC004135 - Page 37 of 51

Fish & Wildlife Maintenance Facilities 200,000 19,291 219,291
Marine Infrastructure/Pier Development 700,000 752,413 1,452,413
Total - Natural Resources 106,502,682 (4,785,368) 101,717,314
Environmental Protection
General Revenues 16,607,743 219,983 16,827,726
Federal Funds 12,825,343 2,885,397 15,710,740
Restricted Receipts 12,660,382 62,782 12,723,164
Other Funds
Transportation MOU 95,967 (35,866) 60,101
Total - Environmental Protection 42,189,435 3,132,296 45,321,731
Grand Total - Environmental Management 164,424,187 (300,641) 164,123,546
Coastal Resources Management Council
General Revenues 3,904,812 269,201 4,174,013
Federal Funds 3,331,166 (222,509) 3,108,657
Restricted Receipts 624,768 (288,957) 335,811
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
South Coast Restoration Project 7,000,000 0 7,000,000
Pawcatuck Resiliency Elevation Study 0 50,000 50,000
Grand Total - Coastal Resources Mgmt.
Council 14,860,746 (192,265) 14,668,481
Transportation
Central Management
Federal Funds 13,777,360 91,840 13,869,200
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 9,004,830 (1,279,968) 7,724,862
Total - Central Management 22,782,190 (1,188,128) 21,594,062
Management and Budget
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 3,839,065 1,635,875 5,474,940
Infrastructure Engineering
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 460,804,783 107,234,705 568,039,488
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
LC004135 - Page 38 of 51

Municipal Roads Grant Program 0 11,421,717 11,421,717
Washington Bridge Project 0 16,895,328 16,895,328
Restricted Receipts 6,066,037 (4,166,072) 1,899,965
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 88,272,135 (2,900,290) 85,371,845
Provided that of this amount, $6,500,000 is appropriated to the Municipal Roads Grant
Program known as RhodeRestore to provide funding to municipalities for the construction and
maintenance of roads, sidewalks, and bridges. Provided that twenty-five percent (25%) of the funds
shall be distributed equally to each city and town, and seventy-five percent (75%) shall be allocated
proportionally based on each municipality’s share of municipally maintained road miles, as
determined by the most recent data available from the Rhode Island department of transportation.
Provided further that each municipality is required to provide a sixty-seven percent (67%) match.
Provided that of this amount, sufficient funds from the Rhode Island public transit
authority’s share of gasoline tax proceeds shall be allocated to the state paratransit program,
including the expansion pilot program known as ride anywhere to ensure statewide paratransit
services are maintained.
Land Sale Revenue 6,239,422 (135,005) 6,104,417
Tolling Revenue 10,000,000 (10,000,000) 0
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Highway Improvement Program 115,617,814 (2,047,814) 113,570,000
Bike Path Asset Protection 400,000 0 400,000
RIPTA - Land and Buildings 6,905,927 (3,773,544) 3,132,383
RIPTA - Pawtucket/Central Falls Bus Hub
Passenger Facility 1,500,000 690,534 2,190,534
RIPTA - Providence High-Capacity Transit
Corridor Study 90,000 103,368 193,368
RIPTA - Kingston Station Mobility Hub 0 1,431,933 1,431,933
RIPTA - Pawtucket Bus Hub 0 126,000 126,000
Total - Infrastructure Engineering 695,896,118 114,880,860 810,776,978
Infrastructure Maintenance
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 41,781,096 12,020,466 53,801,562
The department of transportation will establish a municipal roadway database, which will
include information concerning the name, condition, length, roadway infrastructure, and pedestrian
LC004135 - Page 39 of 51

features of each municipal roadway, updated annually by municipalities. The database will serve
as a comprehensive and transparent list of municipal roadway conditions.
Rhode Island Highway Maintenance
Account 114,037,366 187,636,187 301,673,553
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Maintenance Capital Equipment Replacement 1,800,000 1,858,569 3,658,569
Maintenance Facilities Improvements 859,756 362,407 1,222,163
Welcome Center 150,000 397,183 547,183
Salt Storage Facilities 1,150,000 (36,338) 1,113,662
Train Station Asset Protection 500,000 1,924,237 2,424,237
Total - Infrastructure Maintenance 160,278,218 204,162,711 364,440,929
Grand Total - Transportation 882,795,591 319,491,318 1,202,286,909
Statewide Totals
General Revenues 5,809,363,121 15,647,789 5,825,010,910
Federal Funds 5,108,485,986 400,377,986 5,508,863,972
Restricted Receipts 458,544,467 98,531,046 557,075,513
Other Funds 2,959,985,019 317,131,609 3,277,116,628
Statewide Grand Total 14,336,378,593 831,688,430 15,168,067,023
SECTION 2. Each line appearing in section 1 of this article shall constitute an
appropriation.
SECTION 3. The general assembly authorizes the state controller to establish the internal
service accounts shown below, and no other, to finance and account for the operations of state
agencies that provide services to other agencies, institutions and other governmental units on a cost
reimbursed basis. The purpose of these accounts is to ensure that certain activities are managed in
a businesslike manner; promote efficient use of services by making agencies pay the full costs
associated with providing the services; and allocate the costs of central administrative services
across all fund types, so that federal and other non-general fund programs share in the costs of
general government support. The controller is authorized to reimburse these accounts for the cost
of work or services performed for any other department or agency subject to the following
expenditure limitations:
Account Expenditure Limit
FY 2026 FY 2026 FY 2026
Enacted Change FINAL
State Assessed Fringe Benefit Internal
LC004135 - Page 40 of 51

Service Fund 37,255,808 94,704 37,350,512
Administration Central Utilities Internal
Service Fund 30,366,642 0 30,366,642
State Central Mail Internal Service Fund 9,020,425 (835) 9,019,590
State Telecommunications Internal
Service Fund 3,426,061 3,173 3,429,234
State Automotive Fleet Internal Service Fund 21,610,397 14,815 21,625,212
Surplus Property Internal Service Fund 44,789 0 44,789
Health Insurance Internal Service Fund 272,933,573 69,971,421 342,904,994
Other Post-Employment Benefits Fund 63,854,008 (23,438,854) 40,415,154
Capitol Police Internal Service Fund 1,659,403 188,969 1,848,372
Corrections Central Distribution Center
Internal Service Fund 8,679,440 79,813 8,759,253
Correctional Industries Internal Service Fund 8,477,292 52,361 8,529,653
Secretary of State Record Center Internal
Service Fund 1,231,684 (76,237) 1,155,447
Human Resources Internal Service Fund 18,711,878 (233,544) 18,478,334
DCAMM Facilities Internal Service Fund 40,492,965 40,486 40,533,451
Information Technology Internal
Service Fund 70,587,805 102,554 70,690,359
SECTION 4. Departments and agencies listed below may not exceed the number of full-
time equivalent (FTE) positions shown below in any pay period. Full-time equivalent positions do
not include limited period positions or, seasonal or intermittent positions whose scheduled period
of employment does not exceed twenty-six consecutive weeks or whose scheduled hours do not
exceed nine hundred and twenty-five (925) hours, excluding overtime, in a one-year period. Nor
do they include individuals engaged in training, the completion of which is a prerequisite of
employment. Provided, however, that the governor or designee, speaker of the house of
representatives or designee, and the president of the senate or designee may authorize an adjustment
to any limitation. Prior to the authorization, the state budget officer shall make a detailed written
recommendation to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate. A copy
of the recommendation and authorization to adjust shall be transmitted to the chairman of the house
finance committee, senate finance committee, the house fiscal advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor.
State employees whose funding is from non-state general revenue funds that are time
limited shall receive limited term appointment with the term limited to the availability of non-state
LC004135 - Page 41 of 51

general revenue funding source.
FY 2026 FTE POSITION AUTHORIZATION
Departments and Agencies Full-Time Equivalent
Administration 684.6 683.6
Provided that no more than 434.1 of the total authorization would be limited to positions
that support internal service fund programs.
Office of Energy Resources 17.0
Business Regulation 155.0
Rhode Island Cannabis Control Commission 26.0
Executive Office of Commerce 5.0
Housing 38.0
Labor and Training 461.7
Revenue 605.5
Legislature 298.5
Office of the Lieutenant Governor 8.0
Office of the Secretary of State 62.0
Office of the General Treasurer 92.0
Board of Elections 13.0
Rhode Island Ethics Commission 12.0
Office of the Governor 45.0
Commission for Human Rights 15.0
Public Utilities Commission 57.0
Executive Office of Health and Human Services 243.0
Children, Youth and Families 713.5 719.5
Health 572.6
Human Services 779.0 789.0
Office of Veterans Services 267.0
Office of Healthy Aging 33.0
Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals 1,223.4
Provided that 18.0 of the total authorization would be limited to independent facilitators
positions to comply with the Consent Decree Addendum.
Office of the Child Advocate 13.0
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing 4.0
Governor’s Commission on Disabilities 5.0
LC004135 - Page 42 of 51

Office of the Mental Health Advocate 6.0
Elementary and Secondary Education 156.1
Provided that 3.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by the healthy environments advance learning grant at the school building authority.
School for the Deaf 61.0
Davies Career and Technical School 125.0
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner 48.0
Provided that 1.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds, 12.0 would be available only for positions at the state’s higher
education centers located in Woonsocket and Westerly, 10.0 would be available only for positions
at the nursing education center, and 9.0 would be available for the longitudinal data systems
program.
University of Rhode Island 2,671.0
Provided that 378.8 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds.
Rhode Island College 949.2
Provided that 76.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds.
Community College of Rhode Island 849.1
Provided that 89.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds.
Rhode Island State Council on the Arts 10.0
RI Atomic Energy Commission 8.6
Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission 15.6
Office of the Attorney General 268.1
Corrections 1,461.0
Judicial 749.3
Military Staff 93.0
Emergency Management Agency 38.0
Public Safety 634.0 635.0
Office of the Public Defender 104.0
Environmental Management 439.0
Coastal Resources Management Council 32.0
Transportation 755.0
LC004135 - Page 43 of 51

Total 15,921.8 13,266.8
Effective retroactively to July 1, 2025, the University of Rhode Island shall be exempt from
any limitations imposed on full-time equivalent (FTE) positions.
No agency or department may employ contracted employee services where contract
employees would work under state employee supervisors without determination of need by the
director of administration acting upon positive recommendations by the budget officer and the
personnel administrator and fifteen (15) days after a public hearing.
Nor may any agency or department contract for services replacing work done by state
employees at that time without determination of need by the director of administration acting upon
the positive recommendations of the state budget officer and the personnel administrator and thirty
(30) days after a public hearing.
SECTION 5. The appropriations from federal funds contained in section 1 shall not be
construed to mean any federal funds or assistance appropriated, authorized, allocated or
apportioned to the State of Rhode Island from the state fiscal recovery fund and capital projects
fund enacted pursuant to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 for fiscal year 2026
except for those instances specifically designated.
The State fiscal recovery fund and capital projects fund appropriations herein shall be made
in support of the following projects:
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Department of Administration (DOA)
DOA- Pandemic Recovery Office. These funds shall be allocated to finance the pandemic
recovery office established within the department of administration.
DOA - Public Health Response Warehouse Support. These funds shall be allocated to the
proper storage of PPE and other necessary COVID-19 response related supplies.
DOA - Community Learning Center Programming Support Grant. These funds shall be
distributed to municipalities that have approved community learning center projects under the
coronavirus capital projects fund community learning center municipal grant program. An equal
amount of funding will be allocated to each approved community learning center project that
reaches substantial completion as defined by the U.S. Department of Treasury by October 31, 2026.
Municipalities with projects that do not reach substantial completion as defined by the U.S.
Department of Treasury by October 31, 2026, shall return their funding no later than November 15,
2026, for redistribution among other qualified community learning centers. These funds must be
used to support the establishment of U.S. Department of the Treasury compliant health monitoring,
work, and or education programming that will take place in a community learning center.
LC004135 - Page 44 of 51

DOA - Municipal Public Safety Infrastructure. These funds shall be used to provide
matching support to cities and towns to make significant public safety facilities infrastructure
improvements including new construction. Funding priority shall be based on project readiness and
limited to those for which the total costs exceed $1.0 million. Matching funds to any municipality
will be limited to $5.0 million for projects that serve a regional purpose and $1.0 million for others.
DOA - ERP Implementation Support. These funds shall be used to support the
implementation of a new cloud-based enterprise resource platform for the State of Rhode Island to
more efficiently and strategically administer human resources, payroll, and finance operations.
Office of Energy Resources (OER)
OER - Electric Heat Pump Grant Program. These funds shall support a grant program
within the office of energy resources to assist homeowners and small-to-mid-size business owners
with the purchase and installation of high-efficiency electric heat pumps, with an emphasis on
families in environmental justice communities, minority-owned businesses, and community
organizations who otherwise cannot afford this technology. The office of energy resources shall
report to the speaker of the house and senate president no later than April 1 of each year the results
of this program, including but not limited to, the number of grants issued; amount of each grant and
the average grant amount; and the expected cumulative carbon emissions reductions associated
with heat pumps that received a grant.
Department of Labor and Training (DLT)
DLT - Enhanced Real Jobs. These funds shall support the real jobs Rhode Island program
in the development of job partnerships, connecting industry employers adversely impacted by the
pandemic to individuals enrolled in workforce training programs.
DLT - Unemployment Insurance Trust Fund Contribution. The director of labor and
training shall allocate these appropriations to the employment security fund prior to determining
the experience rate for each eligible employer for calendar year 2023.
Executive Office of Commerce (EOC)
EOC - Bioscience Investments. These funds shall support a program to invest in the
biosciences industry in Rhode Island in conjunction with the Rhode Island life science hub as
established in chapter 99 of title 23. This program will include, but is not limited to, the
development of one or more wet lab incubator spaces in collaboration with industry partners; the
creation of a fund that will support wrap-around services to aid in the commercialization of
technology and business development, growth of the biosciences talent pipeline, and support for
staff to implement the bioscience investments initiative.
EOC - Assistance to Impacted Industries. These funds shall be allocated to provide
LC004135 - Page 45 of 51

assistance to the tourism, hospitality, and events industries for outdoor and public space capital
improvements and event programming.
Executive Office of Housing
Housing - Development of Affordable Housing. These funds shall expand a program at the
Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation to provide additional investments in (1)
the development of affordable housing units in conjunction with general obligation bond funds and
other sources of available financing according to guidelines approved by the coordinating
committee of the housing resources commission or (2) site acquisition and predevelopment
expenses for affordable housing. Of this amount, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be
available to Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation to establish a pilot program
that shall direct funds to support low income public housing through project-based rental assistance
vouchers and financing for pre-development, improvement, and housing production costs. Within
six (6) months, any money available for the pilot that is not yet allocated to viable projects, or
which has been awarded to public housing authorities which are unable to demonstrate substantial
completion of all work within eighteen (18) months of receipt of any such funds, shall be returned
to this program and no longer be included in the pilot. Determination of viability and substantial
completion under the pilot shall be at the sole discretion of the secretary of housing.
Housing - Targeted Housing Development. These funds shall create a program at the
department of housing to develop housing in targeted areas and/or priority projects. Of this overall
program, twenty-two million dollars ($22,000,000) shall be allocated into a priority project fund
that advances the following categories: permanent supportive housing, housing dedicated to
vulnerable populations, individuals transitioning out of state care, and extremely low-income
Rhode Islanders. Of this overall program, four million dollars ($4,000,000) shall be allocated to
support the development of transit-oriented housing as approved by the secretary of housing.
Housing - Site Acquisition. These funds shall be allocated to the Rhode Island housing and
mortgage finance corporation toward the acquisition of properties for redevelopment as affordable
and supportive housing to finance projects that include requirements for deed restrictions not less
than thirty (30) years, and a non-recourse structure.
Housing - Workforce Housing. These funds shall be allocated to the Rhode Island housing
and mortgage finance corporation to support a program to increase the housing supply for families
earning up to 120 percent of area median income.
Housing - Home Repair and Community Revitalization. These funds shall expand the
acquisition and revitalization program administered by the Rhode Island housing and mortgage
finance corporation to finance the acquisition and redevelopment of blighted properties to increase
LC004135 - Page 46 of 51

the number of commercial and community spaces in disproportionately impacted communities and
or to increase the development of affordable housing. Residential development will serve
households earning no more than 80 percent of area median income. Commercial and community
spaces must serve or meet the needs of residents of a census tract where at least 51 percent of the
residents are low-and moderate-income persons. Of this amount, four million five hundred
thousand dollars ($4,500,000) will support critical home repairs within the same communities.
Housing - Predevelopment and Capacity Building. These funds shall support a program to
increase contract staffing capacity to administer proposed affordable housing projects. These funds
will support research and data analysis, stakeholder engagement, and the expansion of services for
people experiencing homelessness.
Housing - Municipal Planning. Of these funds, one million three hundred thousand dollars
($1,300,000) shall support a housing development-focused municipal fellows program within the
department of housing and one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall support municipalities to study
and implement zoning changes that up-zone or otherwise enable additional housing development
in proximity to transit.
Housing - Homelessness Assistance Program. These funds shall support a program to
expand housing navigation, behavioral health, and stabilization services to address pandemic-
related homelessness. The program will support services for people transitioning from
homelessness to housing, including individuals transitioning out of the adult correctional
institutions.
Housing - Homelessness Infrastructure. These funds shall be used to support a program to
respond to and prevent homelessness, including but not limited to, acquisition or construction of
temporary or permanent shelter and other housing solutions and stabilization programs.
Housing - Municipal Homelessness Support Initiative. These funds shall be used to support
a program to award grants to cities and towns for public safety expenses and other municipal
services that support individuals and families experiencing homelessness.
Housing - Proactive Housing Development. These funds shall be used to support the
creation, staffing, and initial activities of a proactive development subsidiary of the Rhode Island
housing and mortgage finance corporation, established pursuant to § 42-55-5.1.
Housing - Housing Related Infrastructure. These funds shall be allocated to the Rhode
Island infrastructure bank as established in chapter 12.2 of title 46 to support physical infrastructure
that is necessary to produce additional housing. All expenditures made with these funds must be
for the pre-development and development of site-related infrastructure for housing that meets
affordable housing pricing and/or income criteria and other criteria established by the department
LC004135 - Page 47 of 51

of housing.
Housing - Statewide Housing Plan. These funds shall be allocated to the development of a
statewide comprehensive housing plan to assess current and future housing needs, consider barriers
to home ownership and affordability, and identify services needed for increased investments toward
disproportionately impacted individuals and communities. These funds shall be used to support
municipal planning efforts to identify and cultivate viable sites and housing projects.
Quonset Development Corporation (QDC)
QDC - Port of Davisville. These funds shall be allocated to expand a program developing
port infrastructure and services at the Port of Davisville in Quonset in accordance with the
corporation’s master plan.
Executive Office of Health and Human Services (EOHHS)
EOHHS - Certified Community Behavioral Clinics. These funds shall be allocated to a
program to support certified community behavioral health clinics to bolster behavioral health
supports, medical screening and monitoring, and social services to particularly vulnerable
populations in response to a rise in mental health needs during the public health emergency.
Department of Children, Youth and Families (DCYF)
DCYF - Provider Workforce Stabilization. These funds shall be allocated to support
workforce stabilization supplemental wage payments and sign-on bonuses to eligible direct care
and supporting care staff of contracted service providers.
DCYF - Psychiatric Treatment Facility. These funds shall be allocated to expand existing
psychiatric residential treatment facility capacity to provide intensive residential treatment options
for adolescent girls and young women who face severe and complex behavioral health challenges.
Any funds that are unexpended shall be allocated to the construction of intensive residential
treatment facilities that will provide female youth in Rhode Island more placement options to
receive appropriate care for their individual levels of need.
Department of Health (DOH)
DOH - COVID-19 Operational Support. These funds shall be allocated to continue
COVID-19 mitigation activities at the department of health and to address the public health impacts
of the pandemic in Rhode Island.
Department of Human Services (DHS)
DHS - Child Care Support. To address the adverse impact the pandemic has had on the
child care sector, the funds allocated to this program will provide retention bonuses for direct-care
staff at child care centers and licensed family providers in response to pandemic-related staffing
shortages and start up and technical assistance grants for family child care providers. Retention
LC004135 - Page 48 of 51

bonuses shall be paid monthly or as often as administratively feasible, but not less than quarterly.
The director of the department of human services and the director of the department of children,
youth and families may waive any fees otherwise assessed upon child care provider applicants who
have been awarded the family child care provider incentive grant. The allocation to this program
will also support quality improvements, the creation of a workforce registry, and additional funds
for educational opportunities for direct care staff.
DHS - SNAP Retail Incentive Pilot. The funds allocated to the Supplemental Nutritional
Assistance Program (SNAP) Retail Incentive Pilot shall be used to reimburse the expenditures
made from general revenue prior to January 1, 2025, in support of the Rhode Island Eat Well, Be
Well Rewards Program. The Rhode Island Eat Well, Be Well Rewards Program is the first and
only statewide retail SNAP incentive program in the United States and provides SNAP recipients
an additional fifty cents ($0.50) for every one dollar ($1.00) of SNAP benefits spent on eligible
fresh fruit and vegetable purchases, up to twenty-five dollars ($25).
Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
(BHDDH)
BHDDH - Crisis Intervention Trainings. To respond to the increased volume of mental-
health related calls reported by police departments, these funds shall be allocated to the crisis
intervention training program to provide training every three years for law enforcement as well as
continuing education opportunities.
BHDDH – 9-8-8 Hotline. These funds shall be allocated for the creation and operation of
a 9-8-8 hotline to maintain compliance with the National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020
and the Federal Communications Commission-adopted rules to assure that all citizens receive a
consistent level of 9-8-8 and crisis behavioral health services.
Rhode Island Department of Elementary and Secondary Education (ELSEC)
RIDE - Adult Education Providers. These funds shall be directly distributed through the
office of adult education to nonprofit adult education providers to expand access to educational
programs and literary services.
RIDE - Out of School Time Education Providers. These funds shall be directly distributed
through the office of student, community and academic supports to expand access to educational
programs.
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner (OPC)
OPC - RI Reconnect. These funds shall support a program to improve postsecondary
degree and credential attainment among working-age Rhode Islanders. The program will assist
students in addressing barriers to education completion, particularly among communities of color
LC004135 - Page 49 of 51

and lower socio-economic strata. A portion of these funds will be used to address barriers to the
attainment of teacher certification as a second language education teacher, grades PK-12, and as an
all grades special education teacher.
OPC - RIC Cybersecurity Center. These funds shall support the establishment of the
institute for cybersecurity and emerging technologies at Rhode Island College, which will provide
certificate, baccalaureate, and master’s level courses with focuses on research and developing
highly skilled cybersecurity professionals. Funding shall be appropriated through the office of
postsecondary commissioner.
OPC - Fresh Start Scholarship. These funds shall support a program to provide scholarships
to adult students with some college credits, but no degree, with a focus on students who dropped-
out of the community college of Rhode Island. This program will target students who are not
meeting satisfactory academic progress requirements, which makes them ineligible for federal
financial assistance.
Department of Public Safety (DPS)
DPS - Support for Survivors of Domestic Violence. These funds shall be allocated to invest
in the nonprofit community to provide additional housing, clinical and mental health services to
victims of domestic violence and sexual assault. This includes increased investments for therapy
and counseling, housing assistance, job training, relocation aid and case management.
Department of Transportation (DOT)
DOT - Municipal Roads Grant Program. These funds shall support a program to distribute
grants with a required local match for the replacement, rehabilitation, preservation, and
maintenance of existing roads, sidewalks, and bridges. These funds shall be distributed equally to
each city and town provided that each municipality is required to provide a sixty-seven percent
(67%) match.
DOT - Washington Bridge Project. These funds shall support the non-federal share or
matching requirement on federal funds for priority transportation projects, including but not limited
to the Washington Bridge project.
Federal Funds - Capital Projects Fund
Department of Administration (DOA)
DOA - CPF Administration. These funds shall be allocated to the department of
administration to oversee the implementation of the capital projects fund award from the American
Rescue Plan Act.
DOA - Community Learning Center Municipal Grant Program. These funds shall be
allocated to a program for cities and towns that renovate or build a community learning center that
LC004135 - Page 50 of 51

meets the work, education, and health monitoring requirements identified by the U.S. Department
of the Treasury.
Executive Office of Commerce (EOC)
EOC - Broadband. These funds shall be allocated to the executive office of commerce to
invest in broadband projects to provide high-speed, reliable internet to all Rhode Islanders. The
secretary of commerce, in partnership with the director of business regulation, will run a series of
requests for proposals for broadband infrastructure projects, providing funds to municipalities,
public housing authorities, business cooperatives and local internet service providers for projects
targeted at those underserved by the current infrastructure using the evidentiary bases authorized
by the United States department of the treasury for the capital projects fund. These funds shall be
used in accordance with the statewide broadband strategic plan and may not be obligated nor
expended prior to its submission in accordance with the requirements of the Rhode Island
broadband development program set forth in chapter 162 of title 42.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the Rhode Island health
and educational building corporation shall transfer to the state controller by June 30, 2026, the sum
of two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000).
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the Rhode Island
infrastructure bank shall transfer to the state controller by June 30, 2026, the sum of two million
dollars ($2,000,000).
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the department of revenue
shall transfer to the state controller by June 30, 2026, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000)
from the Marijuana Trust Fund restricted receipt account.
SECTION 9. This article shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004135
========
LC004135 - Page 51 of 51